Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1302.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 16, 1986 (P.L.1646, No.188), known as the Chiropractic Practice Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 5-ACERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANTSSection 501-A. Chiropractic assistant certifications.(a) Eligibility.--To be eligible for certification by the board as a chiropractic assistant, an applicant shall:123456789101112131415161718192021 (1) be at least 18 years of age unless otherwise determined by the board;(2) possess a high school diploma or its equivalent;(3) prove to the satisfaction of the board that the individual is of good moral character and is not unfit or unable to practice as a chiropractic assistant by reason of physical or mental impairment. In assessing the moral character of an individual with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions);(4) be a graduate of a nationally recognized chiropractic assistant program approved by the board; and(5) successfully pass an examination approved by the board, subject to rules and regulations established by the board and administered in accordance with section 812.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929. An applicant may not be certified as a certified chiropractic assistant unless the applicant has attained passing scores on the examination under this paragraph as published prior to the administration of the examination.(b) Temporary certification.--Upon the submission of an application for certification as a chiropractic assistant as provided by the board, the board shall issue a temporary certificate to the applicant who meets the requirements under subsection (a)(1) and (4) and is eligible to take the examination under subsection (a)(5) . The board shall issue only one temporary certificate under this subsection to an applicant. A temporary certificate under this subsection shall expire upon 20260SB1302PN1641 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the applicant's failure of the first examination under subsection (a)(5), or six months after the date of issuance of the temporary certificate, whichever occurs first. Issuance of a temporary certificate under this subsection shall permit the applicant to engage in the practice of chiropractic assistance only while under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed chiropractor. Upon the expiration of a temporary certificate under this subsection, the applicant shall promptly return the temporary certificate to the board.(c) Second examination.--If an applicant fails the first examination under subsection (a)(5), the applicant for certification, after the expiration of 60 days from the date of the first examination and no later than one year after the first examination, shall have the opportunity to take the examination a second time. The board may adopt regulations governing the eligibility of applicants who have failed to pass two examinations under subsection (a)(5) in order to be admitted to subsequent examinations.(d) Use of title.--Only an individual who has been properly certified as a chiropractic assistant with the board, in accordance with this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated by the board, shall assist a licensed chiropractor as a certified chiropractic assistant and use the title "certified chiropractic assistant" and the abbreviation "CCA."(e) Actions.--The board shall issue, renew, revoke or suspend the certification of a chiropractic assistant in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the board. All actions of the board under this subsection shall be taken subject to the right of notice, hearing and adjudication and the right of appeal in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating 20260SB1302PN1641 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to administrative law and procedure).(f) Reinstatement.--Unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, the board shall not reinstate the certification of an individual to practice as a chiropractic assistant that has been revoked under subsection (e). The individual may apply for certification as a chiropractic assistant after five years have elapsed since the date of revocation in accordance with this chapter.(g) Renewals.--For each certificate renewal, a chiropractic assistant shall complete within the preceding two-year period at least 16 hours of continuing chiropractic education, including eight hours of in-person learning, as approved by the board in accordance with standards and criteria established by the board by rules and regulations. A certified chiropractic assistant shall provide the board with evidence of the completion of the continuing chiropractic education under this subsection. The board's rules and regulations shall remain in effect until such time as the board establishes by regulations, standards and criteria relating to continuing chiropractic education for certified chiropractic assistants.Section 502-A. Performance of chiropractic acts and services.(a) Supervision.--While providing assistance to a licensed chiropractor, a certified chiropractic assistant shall only perform patient-related chiropractic acts and services that are assigned or delegated by and under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed chiropractor.(b) Scope.--A certified chiropractic assistant may provide, demonstrate, administer or observe therapeutic exercise under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed chiropractor. A certified chiropractic assistant may not perform evaluations, 20260SB1302PN1641 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adjustments, test interpretations, other therapeutic procedures or the planning or modification of a plan of care for a patient.(c) Responsibility.--A licensed chiropractor shall be responsible for the performance of acts and services by a certified chiropractic assistant. In all practice settings, the initial patient contact shall be made by a licensed chiropractor for evaluation of the patient and establishment of a plan of care.(d) Consultation.--A certified chiropractic assistant shall consult with the supervising licensed chiropractor in the event of a change in the patient's condition that may require the assessment of a licensed chiropractor.(e) Limitation.--A licensed chiropractor shall not supervise more than three certified chiropractic assistants at any time. If there is a change of the licensed chiropractor supervising a certified chiropractic assistant, the succeeding licensed chiropractor shall be responsible for the ongoing supervision of the certified chiropractic assistant and shall be considered the supervising licensed chiropractor for the purpose of this section.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "therapeutic exercise" shall mean a therapeutic procedure of using exercise to develop strength, endurance, range of motion and flexibility.Section 2. Chapter 6 heading and section 601 of the act are amended to read:CHAPTER 6UNLICENSED OR UNCERTIFIED SUPPORTIVE PERSONNELSection 601. Supportive personnel.(a) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall prohibit a 20260SB1302PN1641 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensed chiropractor from utilizing the assistance of unlicensed or uncertified supportive personnel performing under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed chiropractor, provided that a chiropractor may not delegate any activity or duty to such unlicensed or uncertified individuals which requires formal education or training in the practice of chiropractic or the knowledge and skill of a licensed chiropractor.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "d irect on-premises supervision" shall mean supervision conducted while being physically present in the office suite or facility, but not necessarily in the same room and immediately available.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1302PN1641 - 6 - 12345678910111213